src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-a-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc: рӯпитам
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1: рӯпитамум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2: рӯпитамын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3: рӯпитаме 
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1: рӯпитамуме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2: [рӯпитамын, рӯпитамы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3: рӯпитамыг
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1: рӯпитамув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2: [рӯпитамын, рӯпитамы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3: рӯпитамыт

#Past participle, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: рӯпитамлум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: рӯпитамлын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: рӯпитамтэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: рӯпитамламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: [рӯпитамлын, рӯпитамлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: рӯпитамтэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: рӯпитамлув
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: [рӯпитамлын, рӯпитамлы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: рӯпитаманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: рӯпитамагум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: рӯпитамагын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: рӯпитамаге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: [рӯпитамагаме̄н, рӯпитамагагме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [рӯпитамагы̄н, рӯпитамагагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: [рӯпитамагы̄н, рӯпитамагагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [рӯпитамагув, рӯпитамвгӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [рӯпитамагы̄н, рӯпитамагагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: [рӯпитамагагыл, рӯпитамагаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: [рӯпитаманум, рӯпитамананум]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [рӯпитаман, рӯпитама̄нын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: [рӯпитама̄нэ, рӯпитамана̄нэ]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [рӯпитаманаме̄н, рӯпитамананме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [рӯпитаманн, рӯпитаманы̄н, рӯпитамананы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [рӯпитаманэ̄н, рӯпитамананэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [рӯпитаманув, рӯпитамананув]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [рӯпитаманы̄н, рӯпитамананы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [рӯпитама̄ныл, рӯпитамана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Ger: рӯпитым
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитымам
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитыман
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитыма
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитымаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: [рӯпитыман, рӯпитыман]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: рӯпитнсымаг
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: рӯпитымав
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [рӯпитыман, рӯпитыман]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: рӯпитымат

#Privative
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Ger: рӯпаттал
